Utah statutes.
53A-6-110.   Administrative/supervisory letters of authorization.

(1)  A local school board may request, and the State Board of Education may grant, a letter of authorization permitting a person with outstanding professional qualifications to serve in any position that requires a person to hold an administrative/supervisory license or certificate, including principal, assistant principal, associate principal, vice principal, assistant superintendent, administrative assistant, director, specialist, or other district position.

(2)  The State Board of Education may grant a letter of authorization permitting a person with outstanding professional qualifications to serve in any position at the State Office of Education that requires a person to hold an administrative/supervisory license or certificate.



Enacted by Chapter 315, 2003 General Session

